California statutes. Public Resources Code
(11) Make recommendations to the office with respect to a standard design and detail for the marker or plaque which may be erected or raised at registered historical landmarks or historical resources, and with respect to the use of the marker or plaque. The commission shall consult with cities and counties in developing design and placement standards. These standards shall not prevent a city or county from implementing its own standards if they meet the minimum criteria established by the commission.

(12) Recommend to the department the type of directional sign to be erected in connection with the registration of a point of historical interest. The commission shall consult with cities and counties in developing design and placement standards. These standards shall not prevent a city or county from implementing its own standards if they meet the minimum criteria established by the commission.

(13) Submit an annual report in January to the director and the Legislature giving an account of its activities, identifying unattained goals of historical resources plans and programs, and recommending needed legislation for the support of those programs. The director shall advise the commission of new and continuing plans, policy, and programs concerning statewide historical resources and shall receive and consider the views of the commission.

(14) Consult with, and consider the recommendation of, public agencies, civic groups, and citizens interested in historic preservation.

(15) Develop criteria and procedures based upon public hearings and active public participation for the selection of projects to be funded through the National Historic Preservation Fund, the California Heritage Fund, and other federal and state programs that have as their primary purpose the preservation and enhancement of historical resources.

(16) Prepare, or cause to be prepared, and recommend to the director, a budget with respect to those duties and responsibilities of the commission contained in this section.

(b) The commission may adopt guidelines for the review of applications for excavation and salvage permits submitted pursuant to Section 6313 and make recommendations thereon to the State Lands Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5020.5.

(a) The commission shall develop criteria and methods for determining the significance of archaeological sites, for selecting the most important archaeological sites, and for determining whether the most significant archaeological sites should be preserved intact or excavated and interpreted.

(b) The commission shall develop guidelines for the reasonable and feasible collection, storage, and display of archaeological specimens.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 859.)
-------------------------------------------

5020.6.

(a) The Governor shall appoint the State Historic Preservation Officer. The director, in consultation with the commission, shall submit to the Governor a list of persons to be considered for the position. The person appointed shall be knowledgeable about historical resources.

(b) The officer shall serve as the executive secretary of the commission and shall be the chief administrative officer of the Office of Historic Preservation in the department.

(c) The officer shall have no responsibilities other than those provided by statute, executive order, and regulation, as well as any other duties the director assigns for the preservation and enhancement of the state’s historical resources.

(d) The officer, or the officer’s alternate, shall serve as an ex officio member of the Historic State Capitol Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 876, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5020.7.

The Legislature recognizes that the long-term preservation and enhancement of historical resources is dependent, to a large extent, on the good will and cooperation of the general public and of the public and private owners of those resources.

Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature that public agencies, including the commission and the office, shall endeavor to carry out their responsibilities under this article in a manner designed to elicit the cooperation of the owners of both identified and unidentified resources, to encourage the owners to perceive these resources as assets rather than liabilities, and to encourage the support of the general public for the preservation and enhancement of historical resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1075, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5021.

The department shall consider all recommendations for registration made by the commission, and shall register, as state historical landmarks, those buildings, structures, sites, or places which the department deems to be important historical resources and shall register, as points of historical interest, those buildings, structures, sites, or places which the department deems to be historical resources of sufficient historical interest to qualify for the placement of signs pursuant to Section 5022.5. The commission shall maintain a register which shall identify by number and description such historical landmarks and points of historical interest.

The department may publish results of office and field archaeological investigation annually and shall issue additional publications, such as detailed site reports and area resource reports, as necessary, to inform the public and educational institutions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1156.)
-------------------------------------------

5022.

The department may contract with or cooperate with public or private agencies for suitable plaques, markers, and directional signs at the site of, or on the approaches to, registered historical landmarks or points of historical interest, including signs on highways and roads.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1156.)
-------------------------------------------

5022.5.

There shall be two categories of places of historical significance: the registered historical landmark and the registered point of historical interest. The location of the point of historical interest shall be designated by a sign indicating “Point of Historical Interest” with an appropriate direction, which sign shall be erected and maintained by the Department of Transportation, as to state highways, or the county authorities or city authorities, as to streets or highways under their jurisdictions. A local historical group or organization may raise a marker or plaque at a registered point of historical interest. Nothing herein shall require the signing of such points where parking is not available or where such signing would cause a traffic safety hazard or would interfere with the normal flow of traffic.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

5022.6.

The department shall adopt standard design and detail for the marker and for the plaque which may be erected or raised at registered historical landmarks. The use of such marker or plaque shall be prescribed by rule adopted by the department. Any person who maliciously or for commercial purposes, or contrary to such rule, uses or allows to be used any reproduction or facsimile of such standard marker or plaque in any manner whatsoever is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 791.)
-------------------------------------------

5023.

(a) It shall be the duty of the Department of Transportation to keep in repair all objects or markers adjacent to a state highway which have been erected to mark registered historical places and to keep such monuments or markers free from vegetation which may obscure them from view.

(b) It shall be the duty of the county authorities, in charge of county highways, and all city authorities, with respect to streets and highways under their respective jurisdictions, to keep in repair or cause to be kept in repair all objects or markers adjacent to a public highway which have been erected to mark registered historical places and to keep such markers and monuments free from all vegetation which may obscure them from view.

(c) It shall be the duty of the department to keep in repair or cause to be kept in repair all objects, markers and monuments designating any registered historical places in respect to which no obligation in respect thereto is imposed on other governmental agencies by this section, and the department shall keep such markers and monuments free from all vegetation which may obscure them from view.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

5024.

(a) On or before January 1, 1982, each state agency shall formulate policies to preserve and maintain, when prudent and feasible, all state-owned historical resources under its jurisdiction listed in or potentially eligible for inclusion in the National Register of Historic Places or registered or eligible for registration as a state historical landmark pursuant to Section 5021. The State Historic Preservation Officer shall provide such agencies with advice and assistance as needed.

(b) On or before July 1, 1983, each state agency shall submit to the State Historic Preservation Officer an inventory of all state-owned structures over 50 years of age under its jurisdiction listed in or which may be eligible for inclusion in the National Register of Historic Places or registered or which may be eligible for registration as a state historical landmark. State-owned structures in freeway rights-of-way shall be inventoried before approval of any undertaking which would alter their original or significant features or fabric, or transfer, relocate or demolish those structures.

(c) The State Historic Preservation Officer, with the advice of the State Historical Resources Commission, shall establish standards, after consultation with agencies to be affected, for the submittal of inventories and development of policies for the review of historical resources identified pursuant to this section. These review procedures shall permit the State Historic Preservation Officer to determine which historical resources identified in inventories meet National Register of Historic Places and state historical landmark criteria and shall be placed in the master list of historical resources.

(d) The State Historic Preservation Officer shall maintain a master list comprised of all inventoried structures submitted and determined significant pursuant to this section and all state-owned historical resources currently listed in the National Register of Historic Places or registered as a state historical landmark under state agency jurisdiction. The State Historic Preservation Officer shall inform agencies with historical resources on the master list of current sources of funding for preservation activities, including rehabilitation and restoration.

(e) On or before July 1, 1984, and annually thereafter, each state agency shall submit inventory updates to the State Historic Preservation Officer and a statement of its year’s preservation activities.

(f) Each state agency shall submit to the State Historic Preservation Officer for comment documentation for any project having the potential to affect historical resources listed in or potentially eligible for inclusion in the National Register of Historic Places or registered as or eligible for registration as a state historical landmark.

(g) As used in this section and Section 5024.5, “state agency” means any agency, department, division, commission, board, bureau, officer, or other authority of the State of California.

(h) As used in this section and Section 5024.5, “structure” means an immovable work constructed by man having interrelated parts in a definite pattern of organization and used to shelter or promote a form of human activity and which constitutes an historical resource.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1101, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5024.1.

(a) A California Register of Historical Resources is hereby established. The California Register is an authoritative guide in California to be used by state and local agencies, private groups, and citizens to identify the state’s historical resources and to indicate what properties are to be protected, to the extent prudent and feasible, from substantial adverse change. The commission shall oversee the administration of the California Register.

(b) The California Register shall include historical resources determined by the commission, according to procedures adopted by the commission, to be significant and to meet the criteria in subdivision (c).

(c) A resource may be listed as an historical resource in the California Register if it meets any of the following National Register of Historic Places criteria:

(1) Is associated with events that have made a significant contribution to the broad patterns of California’s history and cultural heritage.

(2) Is associated with the lives of persons important in our past.

(3) Embodies the distinctive characteristics of a type, period, region, or method of construction, or represents the work of an important creative individual, or possesses high artistic values.

(4) Has yielded, or may be likely to yield, information important in prehistory or history.

(d) The California Register shall include the following:

(1) California properties formally determined eligible for, or listed in, the National Register of Historic Places.

(2) State Historical Landmark No. 770 and all consecutively numbered state historical landmarks following No. 770. For state historical landmarks preceding No. 770, the office shall review their eligibility for the California Register in accordance with procedures to be adopted by the commission.

(3) Points of historical interest which have been reviewed by the office and recommended for listing by the commission for inclusion in the California Register in accordance with criteria adopted by the commission.

(e) If nominated for listing in accordance with subdivision (f), and determined to be significant by the commission, the California Register may include the following:

(1) Individual historical resources.

(2) Historical resources contributing to the significance of an historic district under criteria adopted by the commission.

(3) Historical resources identified as significant in historical resources surveys, if the survey meets the criteria listed in subdivision (g).

(4) Historical resources and historic districts designated or listed as city or county landmarks or historic properties or districts pursuant to any city or county ordinance, if the criteria for designation or listing under the ordinance have been determined by the office to be consistent with California Register criteria adopted by the commission.

(5) Local landmarks or historic properties designated under any municipal or county ordinance.

(f) A resource may be nominated for listing as an historical resource in the California Register in accordance with nomination procedures adopted by the commission, subject to all of the following:

(1) If the applicant is not the local government in whose jurisdiction the resource is located, a notice of nomination in the form prescribed by the commission shall first be submitted by the applicant to the clerk of the local government. The notice shall request the local government to join in the nomination, to provide comments on the nomination, or if the local government declines to join in the nomination or fails to act upon the notice of nomination within 90 days, the nomination may be submitted to the office and shall include any comments of the local government.

(2) Prior to acting on the nomination of a survey, an individual resource, an historic district, or other resource to be added to the California Register, the commission shall notify property owners, the local government in which the resource is located, local agencies, other interested persons, and members of the general public of the nomination and provide not less than 60 calendar days for comment on the nomination. The commission shall consider those comments in determining whether to list the resource as an historical resource in the California Register.

(3) If the local government objects to the nomination, the commission shall give full and careful consideration to the objection before acting upon the nomination. Where an objection has been raised, the commission shall adopt written findings to support its determination concerning the nomination. At a minimum, the findings shall identify the historical or cultural significance of the resource, and, if applicable, the overriding significance of the resource that has resulted in the resource being listed in the California Register over the objections of the local government.

(4) If the owner of a private property or the majority of owners for an historic district or single property with multiple owners object to the nomination, the commission shall not list the property as an historical resource in the California Register until the objection is withdrawn. Objections shall be submitted to the commission by the owner of the private property in the form of a notarized statement certifying that the party is the sole or partial owner of the property, and that the party objects to the listing.

(5) If private property cannot be presently listed in the California Register solely because of owner objection, the commission shall nevertheless designate the property as eligible for listing.

(g) A resource identified as significant in an historical resource survey may be listed in the California Register if the survey meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The survey has been or will be included in the State Historic Resources Inventory.

(2) The survey and the survey documentation were prepared in accordance with office procedures and requirements.

(3) The resource is evaluated and determined by the office to have a significance rating of Category 1 to 5 on DPR Form 523.

(4) If the survey is five or more years old at the time of its nomination for inclusion in the California Register, the survey is updated to identify historical resources which have become eligible or ineligible due to changed circumstances or further documentation and those which have been demolished or altered in a manner that substantially diminishes the significance of the resource.

(h) Upon listing an historical resource or determining that a property is an historical resource that is eligible for listing, in the California Register, the commission shall notify any owner of the historical resource and also the county and city in which the historical resource is located in accordance with procedures adopted by the commission.

(i) The commission shall adopt procedures for the delisting of historical resources which become ineligible for listing in the California Register.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1075, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5024.5.

(a) No state agency shall alter the original or significant historical features or fabric, or transfer, relocate, or demolish historical resources on the master list maintained pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 5024 without, early in the planning processes, first giving notice and a summary of the proposed action to the officer who shall have 30 days after receipt of the notice and summary for review and comment.

(b) If the officer determines that a proposed action will have an adverse effect on a listed historical resource, the head of the state agency having jurisdiction over the historical resource and the officer shall adopt prudent and feasible measures that will eliminate or mitigate the adverse effects. The officer shall consult the State Historical Building Safety Board for advice when appropriate.

(c) Each state agency shall maintain written documentation of the officer’s concurrence with proposed actions which would have an effect on an historical resource on the master list.

(d) The officer shall report to the Office of Planning and Research for mediation instances of state agency refusal to propose, to consider, or to adopt prudent and feasible alternatives to eliminate or mitigate adverse effects on historical resources on the master list as specified in subdivision (f) of Section 5024.

(e) The officer may monitor the implementation of proposed actions of any state agency.

(f) Until such time as a structure is evaluated for possible inclusion in the inventory pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 5024, state agencies shall assure that any structure which might qualify for listing is not inadvertently transferred or unnecessarily altered.

(g) The officer may provide local governments with information on methods to preserve their historical resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1075, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5024.6.

There is in the department the State Office of Historic Preservation, which is under the direction of the officer. The office shall do all of the following:

(a) Serve as the staff of the commission in carrying out its responsibilities, and as the staff of the officer in carrying out the responsibilities of that position.

(b) Recommend properties of historical significance for nomination by the commission for the National Register of Historic Places, for registration as historical landmarks and points of historical interest, and for listing in the California Register.

(c) Administer state and federal incentive programs for the preservation of historical resources, including the California Register.

(d) Provide information on federal and state benefits for preservation projects and enhancement of historical resources.

(e) Administer grant and loan programs to survey historical resources and assist the development and enhancement of these resources.

(f) Assist other state agencies by providing information and education on the economic and social benefits of utilizing historical resources.

(g) Provide public education and information on the preservation and enhancement of historical resources.

(h) Provide information and technical assistance
 to local, state, and national organizations to promote preservation and enhancement of historical resources by developing model ordinances, financial mechanisms, educational programs, conferences, workshops, and other materials.

(i) Cooperate with cultural and ethnic commissions, such as the Native American Heritage Commission, or other organizations or representatives when projects involve these groups’ concerns.

(j) Review and comment on the impact on historical resources of publicly funded projects and programs undertaken by other governmental agencies.

(k) Review applications for excavation and salvage permits for salvage in state waters.

(l) Assist the State Lands Commission in administering Section 6313.

(m) Administer the California Register in accordance with procedures adopted by the commission.

(n) Administer and maintain the State Historic Resources Inventory in accordance with procedures developed by the office and adopted by the commission.

(o) Administer the California Heritage Fund created pursuant to Section 5079.10.

(p) Educate the public on the process required to nominate a resource for listing as a historical resource in the California Register pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 5024.1, with particular emphasis on educating the public regarding nominating resources associated with the labor movement, the civil rights movement, and the state’s modern history by providing information in its quarterly newsletter or other appropriate
 publications, and on the State Office of Historic Preservation’s Internet Web site.

(q) By January 1, 2015, identify publicly owned resources that may be appropriate for potential listing as historical resources, historical landmarks, or points of historical interest for their association with the labor movement, the civil rights movement, or the state’s modern history. The State Office of Historic Preservation shall report its findings to the commission.

(r) For the purposes of this section, “modern history” means history on and after 1940.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 641, Sec. 2.   (AB 34)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5025.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that there is a need for state repositories dedicated to the preservation and restoration of historic artifacts relating to the science, art, and practice of aviation in this state and the nation.

(b) The California City Museum and Restoration Facility is hereby designated a state aviation museum.

(c) The department may extend technical assistance and other nonfinancial support to the California City Museum and Restoration Facility. The California City Museum and Restoration Facility shall reimburse the department for all costs incurred pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) The California City Museum and Restoration Facility may serve as a repository for the purpose of collecting, preserving, restoring, and displaying artifacts and memorabilia of the significant role that the state has played in the development of aviation, and may also store and display national and international memorabilia of the aviation industry and its pioneers and practitioners.

(e) Prior to the acceptance of any aircraft, any aircraft-related artifacts, tools, or supplies, or any other materials for display in the aviation museum, it is the intent of the Legislature that the California City Museum and Restoration Facility execute an agreement with any donor of those materials that provides for the disposition of the materials if the museum closes or otherwise becomes inaccessible to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 299, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5025.11.

The department shall, with the advice of the Historical Landmarks Advisory Committee, or, as to certifications on or after January 1, 1975, with the advice of the commission, certify the route followed by Colonel John Charles Fremont and party from the Nevada state line through Mono, Inyo, Alpine, Amador, and El Dorado Counties to Sutter’s Fort in Sacramento County in the winter of 1843, and the Donner Party Trail, from the Nevada state line to the junction of Verdi Canyon to Alder Creek Camp of the Donner Party, thence to the Donner Monument at Donner Memorial State Park. The department may certify and mark, with the advice of the commission, other historic routes of travel within the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1156.)
-------------------------------------------

5025.12.

The department is authorized to place suitable markers along these certified routes at intervals and at each intersection with a state highway or county road.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 304.)
-------------------------------------------

5025.2.

It shall be the duty of the department to keep in repair, or cause to be kept in repair, all markers of such historical routes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2164.)
-------------------------------------------

5025.3.

The Governor’s Mansion, located at 1526 H Street, Sacramento, shall be under the control and management of the department and shall be named the Old Governor’s Mansion State Historic Park, subject to the approval of the State Park and Recreation Commission. The Director of General Services shall transfer jurisdiction over the property and all its contents to the Department of Parks and Recreation, which shall administer the property as a unit of the state park system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1245, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5026.

Upon receipt of an application for an entry on the National Register of Historic Places and prior to making any evaluation and recommendation with respect to such application, the commission shall first submit the application to the appropriate city council or county board of supervisors for comment. The city council or county board of supervisors shall have 45 days from the date of receipt in which to transmit written comments to the commission. Each member of the commission shall be provided by staff with a copy of such comments not less than 15 days prior to the hearing on the application by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 624.)
-------------------------------------------

5027.

Any building or structure that is listed on the National Register of Historic Places and is transferred from state ownership to another public agency shall not be demolished, destroyed, or significantly altered, except for restoration to preserve or enhance its historical values, without the prior approval of the Legislature by statute. This section applies to any building or structure transferred from state ownership to another public agency after January 1, 1987.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1358, Sec. 2.3.)
-------------------------------------------

5027.1.

(a) As required by Section 5027, the Legislature hereby approves demolition of the Transbay Terminal building at First and Mission Streets in the City and County of San Francisco, including its associated vehicle ramps, for construction of a new terminal at the same location, designed to serve Caltrain in addition to local, regional, and intercity buslines, and designed to accommodate high-speed passenger rail service. The Transbay Joint Powers Authority shall have primary jurisdiction with respect to all matters concerning the financing, design, development, construction, and operation of the new terminal.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any redevelopment plan adopted to finance, in whole or in part, the demolition of the Transbay Terminal building and the construction of a new terminal, including its associated vehicle ramps, shall ensure that at least 25 percent of all dwelling units developed within the project area shall be available at affordable housing cost to, and occupied by, persons and families whose incomes do not exceed 60 percent of the area median income, and that at least an additional 10 percent of all dwelling units developed within the project area shall be available at affordable housing cost to, and occupied by, persons and families whose incomes do not exceed 120 percent of the area median income. The redevelopment agency shall ensure that dwelling units made affordable pursuant to this subdivision remain available at affordable housing cost to, and occupied by, persons and families of the respective income categories consistent with the time requirements contained in subdivision (f) of Section 33334.3 of, and subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 33413 of, the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 99, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5028.

(a) No structure that is listed on the National Register of Historic Places, on the California Register of Historic Places, or on any local public register of historic places, and that has been damaged due to a natural disaster, including, but not limited to, an earthquake, fire, or flood, may be demolished, destroyed, or significantly altered, except for restoration to preserve or enhance its historical values, unless the structure presents an imminent threat to the public of bodily harm or of damage to adjacent property, or unless the State Office of Historic Preservation determines, pursuant to subdivision (b), that the structure may be demolished, destroyed, or significantly altered.

(b) Any local government may apply to the State Office of Historic Preservation for its determination as to whether a structure meeting the description set forth in subdivision (a) shall be demolished, destroyed, or significantly altered. That determination shall be based upon the extent of damage to the structure, the cost of rehabilitating or reconstructing the structure, the structure’s historical significance, and any other factor deemed by the State Office of Historic Preservation to be relevant. In making that determination, the State Office of Historic Preservation shall consider the recommendation made by a team selected by the State Office of Historic Preservation, composed of three residents with historic preservation expertise who reside in the affected county. The determination of the State Office of Historic Preservation shall be issued no later than 30 days after the structure was damaged, or 30 days after the receipt of the application, whichever occurred later.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 6.   Effective November 7, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

5029.

(a) The commission shall, within 90 days after the approval by the director of the issuance by the commission of an historical resources designation for an individual property, submit to the county recorder for recordation, and the county recorder shall record, a certified resolution establishing the historical resources designation. For historical resources designations approved prior to March 15, 1993, the commission may submit for recordation, and the county recorder shall record, a certified resolution of historical resources designation.

(b) Any local agency, or unit thereof, shall, within 90 days of an historical resources designation by the local agency or unit for an individual property, submit to the county recorder for recordation, and the county recorder shall record, a certified resolution establishing the historical resources designation. For historical resources designations made prior to March 15, 1993, the local agency, or unit thereof, may submit for recordation, and the county recorder shall record, a certified resolution of historical resources designation.

(c) The resolution shall include the name of the current property owner, the designating entity, the specific historical resources designation, and a legal description of the property.

(d) The recorder shall index the recorded resolutions of the commission or local agency, or unit thereof, listing the respective agency as the “grantor” and the current owner as the “grantee” for that purpose.

(e) For the purpose of this section, the term “historical resources designation” means the California Register of Historical Resources and any local historical resources designation resulting in restrictions on demolitions or alterations.

(f) This section shall have no effect on the right, title, or interest in the property identified after March 15, 1993, which is acquired by a bona fide purchaser for value between the time of designation of the property as a historical resource and time that the designation is recorded unless the purchaser had actual knowledge of the designation.

(g) This section shall have no effect upon the title to any property that is subject to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 173.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5029.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, fifty percent (50%) of the revenue collected by the Department of Transportation, in each fiscal year, from rental receipts from a federally designated historic property, or from property listed as a state historical resource pursuant to Section 5024, that is owned by the Department of Transportation and located in a freeway right-of-way corridor, less any amount transmitted in lieu of property tax to a city, county, or city and county, as required by law, shall be deposited in the Historic Property Maintenance Fund, which is hereby created in the Treasury.

(b) Moneys in the fund may be expended by the Department of Transportation, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to pay for costs associated with the maintenance and operation of the historic property described in subdivision (a). Any moneys deposited into the fund are in addition to, and are not intended to supplant or replace, any existing funds that are currently available to any state agency for the operation and maintenance of historical resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 759, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5029.6.

Notwithstanding the nomination process established pursuant to Section 5021, the land known as Nuestra Señora Reina de La Paz, which includes the home and burial site of the late Cesar Chavez, shall be registered as a state historical landmark.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 641, Sec. 3.   (AB 34)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5029.7.

(a) Subdivision (f) of Section 5024 shall not apply to the San Quentin Rehabilitation Center, San Quentin: Demolition of Building 38 and Construction of New Educational and Vocational Center project and the San Quentin Rehabilitation Center, San Quentin: Improvement Projects authorized in the 2023 Budget Act, or any actions or approvals related to those projects.

(b) Section 5024.5 shall not apply to any actions related to the demolition, design, or construction of the San Quentin Rehabilitation Center, San Quentin: Demolition of Building 38 and Construction of New Educational and Vocational Center project and the San Quentin Rehabilitation Center, San Quentin: Improvement Projects authorized in the 2023 Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 47, Sec. 26.   (AB 134)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Qualified Historical Property [5031. - 5033.]

5031.

“Qualified historical property” means privately owned property which is not exempt from property taxation, is visually accessible to the public, and which is:

(a) All landmark registrations up to and including Register No. 769, which were approved without the benefit of criteria, shall be approved only if the landmark site conforms to the existing criteria as determined by the California Historical Landmarks Advisory Committee or as to approvals on or after January 1, 1975, by the State Historical Resources Commission. Any other registered California historical landmark under Article 2 (commencing with Section 5020) of this chapter, except points of historical interest, and which satisfies any of the following requirements:

(1) The property is the first, last, only, or most significant historical property of its type in the region;

(2) The property is associated with an individual or group having a profound influence on the history of California; or

(3) The property is a prototype of, or an outstanding example of, a period, style, architectural movement, or construction, or if it is one of the more notable works, or the best surviving work, in a region of a pioneer architect, designer, or master builder; or

(b) A property which is listed on the national register described in Section 470A of Title 16 of the United States Code; or

(c) A property which is listed on a city or county register or inventory of historical or architecturally significant sites, places or landmarks, provided, that such property satisfies any of the requirements set forth in paragraph 1, 2 or 3 under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

5032.

(a) “Qualified historical property” pursuant to Section 5031 includes:

(1) Individual sites having structures.

(2) Façades or portions of entire sites.

(3) Historic districts.

(b) “Qualified historical property” does not include individual sites without structures.
